Illinois, session 104th, HB1038.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Sections 401 and 401.1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 570/401)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1401)7    Sec. 401. Manufacture or delivery, or possession with 8intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance, a 9counterfeit substance, or controlled substance analog. Except 10as authorized by this Act, it is unlawful for any person 11knowingly to manufacture or deliver, or possess with intent to 12manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance other than 13methamphetamine and other than bath salts as defined in the 14Bath Salts Prohibition Act sold or offered for sale in a retail 15mercantile establishment as defined in Section 16-0.1 of the 16Criminal Code of 2012, a counterfeit substance, or a 17controlled substance analog. A violation of this Act with 18respect to each of the controlled substances listed herein 19constitutes a single and separate violation of this Act. For 20purposes of this Section, "controlled substance analog" or 21"analog" means a substance, other than a controlled substance, 22which is not approved by the United States Food and Drug 23Administration or, if approved, is not dispensed or possessed   HB1038- 2 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1in accordance with State or federal law, and that has a 2chemical structure substantially similar to that of a 3controlled substance in Schedule I or II, or that was 4specifically designed to produce an effect substantially 5similar to that of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II. 6Examples of chemical classes in which controlled substance 7analogs are found include, but are not limited to, the 8following: phenethylamines, N-substituted piperidines, 9morphinans, ecgonines, quinazolinones, substituted indoles, 10and arylcycloalkylamines. For purposes of this Act, a 11controlled substance analog shall be treated in the same 12manner as the controlled substance to which it is 13substantially similar.14    (a) Any person who violates this Section with respect to 15the following amounts of controlled or counterfeit substances 16or controlled substance analogs, notwithstanding any of the 17provisions of subsections (c), (d), (e), (f), (g) or (h) to the 18contrary, is guilty of a Class X felony and shall be sentenced 19to a term of imprisonment as provided in this subsection (a) 20and fined as provided in subsection (b):21        (1)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 22    with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 100 grams of 23    a substance containing heroin, or an analog thereof;24        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 25    with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 400 grams 26    of a substance containing heroin, or an analog thereof;  HB1038- 3 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 2    with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 900 grams 3    of a substance containing heroin, or an analog thereof;4        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 5    with respect to 900 grams or more of any substance 6    containing heroin, or an analog thereof;7        (1.5)(A) not less than 9 6 years and not more than 40 8    30 years with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 100 9    grams of a substance containing fentanyl, or an analog 10    thereof;11        (B) not less than 12 9 years and not more than 50 40 12    years with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 400 13    grams of a substance containing fentanyl, or an analog 14    thereof;15        (C) not less than 15 12 years and not more than 60 50 16    years with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 900 17    grams of a substance containing fentanyl, or an analog 18    thereof;19        (D) not less than 18 15 years and not more than 70 60 20    years with respect to 900 grams or more of a substance 21    containing fentanyl, or an analog thereof;22        (2)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 23    with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 100 grams of 24    a substance containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;25        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 26    with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 400 grams   HB1038- 4 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1    of a substance containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;2        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 3    with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 900 grams 4    of a substance containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;5        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 6    with respect to 900 grams or more of any substance 7    containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;8        (3)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 9    with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 100 grams of 10    a substance containing morphine, or an analog thereof;11        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 12    with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 400 grams 13    of a substance containing morphine, or an analog thereof;14        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 15    with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 900 grams 16    of a substance containing morphine, or an analog thereof;17        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 18    with respect to 900 grams or more of a substance 19    containing morphine, or an analog thereof;20        (4) 200 grams or more of any substance containing 21    peyote, or an analog thereof;22        (5) 200 grams or more of any substance containing a 23    derivative of barbituric acid or any of the salts of a 24    derivative of barbituric acid, or an analog thereof;25        (6) 200 grams or more of any substance containing 26    amphetamine or any salt of an optical isomer of   HB1038- 5 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1    amphetamine, or an analog thereof;2        (6.5) (blank);3        (6.6) (blank);4        (7)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 5    with respect to: (i) 15 grams or more but less than 100 6    grams of a substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 7    (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 15 or more objects or 8    15 or more segregated parts of an object or objects but 9    less than 200 objects or 200 segregated parts of an object 10    or objects containing in them or having upon them any 11    amounts of any substance containing lysergic acid 12    diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof;13        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 14    with respect to: (i) 100 grams or more but less than 400 15    grams of a substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 16    (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 200 or more objects or 17    200 or more segregated parts of an object or objects but 18    less than 600 objects or less than 600 segregated parts of 19    an object or objects containing in them or having upon 20    them any amount of any substance containing lysergic acid 21    diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof;22        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 23    with respect to: (i) 400 grams or more but less than 900 24    grams of a substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 25    (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 600 or more objects or 26    600 or more segregated parts of an object or objects but   HB1038- 6 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1    less than 1500 objects or 1500 segregated parts of an 2    object or objects containing in them or having upon them 3    any amount of any substance containing lysergic acid 4    diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof;5        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 6    with respect to: (i) 900 grams or more of any substance 7    containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), or an analog 8    thereof, or (ii) 1500 or more objects or 1500 or more 9    segregated parts of an object or objects containing in 10    them or having upon them any amount of a substance 11    containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), or an analog 12    thereof;13    (7.5)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 14    with respect to: (i) 15 grams or more but less than 100 15    grams of a substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), 16    (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or 17    (26) of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or 18    derivative thereof, or (ii) 15 or more pills, tablets, 19    caplets, capsules, or objects but less than 200 pills, 20    tablets, caplets, capsules, or objects containing in them 21    or having upon them any amounts of any substance listed in 22    paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 23    (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of Section 24    204, or an analog or derivative thereof;25        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 26    with respect to: (i) 100 grams or more but less than 400   HB1038- 7 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1    grams of a substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), 2    (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or 3    (26) of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or 4    derivative thereof, or (ii) 200 or more pills, tablets, 5    caplets, capsules, or objects but less than 600 pills, 6    tablets, caplets, capsules, or objects containing in them 7    or having upon them any amount of any substance listed in 8    paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 9    (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of Section 10    204, or an analog or derivative thereof;11        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 12    with respect to: (i) 400 grams or more but less than 900 13    grams of a substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), 14    (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or 15    (26) of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or 16    derivative thereof, or (ii) 600 or more pills, tablets, 17    caplets, capsules, or objects but less than 1,500 pills, 18    tablets, caplets, capsules, or objects containing in them 19    or having upon them any amount of any substance listed in 20    paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 21    (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of Section 22    204, or an analog or derivative thereof;23        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 24    with respect to: (i) 900 grams or more of any substance 25    listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), 26    (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d)   HB1038- 8 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1    of Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof, or 2    (ii) 1,500 or more pills, tablets, caplets, capsules, or 3    objects containing in them or having upon them any amount 4    of a substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), 5    (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of 6    subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or derivative 7    thereof;8        (8) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 9    pentazocine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 10    isomers of pentazocine, or an analog thereof;11        (9) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 12    methaqualone or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 13    isomers of methaqualone, or an analog thereof;14        (10) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 15    phencyclidine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 16    isomers of phencyclidine (PCP), or an analog thereof;17        (10.5) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 18    ketamine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of isomers 19    of ketamine, or an analog thereof;20        (10.6) 100 grams or more of any substance containing 21    hydrocodone, or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 22    isomers of hydrocodone, or an analog thereof;23        (10.7) (blank);24        (10.8) 100 grams or more of any substance containing 25    dihydrocodeine, or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 26    isomers of dihydrocodeine, or an analog thereof;  HB1038- 9 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1        (10.9) 100 grams or more of any substance containing 2    oxycodone, or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 3    isomers of oxycodone, or an analog thereof;4        (11) 200 grams or more of any substance containing any 5    other controlled substance classified in Schedules I or 6    II, or an analog thereof, which is not otherwise included 7    in this subsection.8    (b) Any person sentenced with respect to violations of 9paragraph (1), (2), (3), (7), or (7.5) of subsection (a) 10involving 100 grams or more of the controlled substance named 11therein, may in addition to the penalties provided therein, be 12fined an amount not more than $500,000 or the full street value 13of the controlled or counterfeit substance or controlled 14substance analog, whichever is greater. The term "street 15value" shall have the meaning ascribed in Section 110-5 of the 16Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. Any person sentenced with 17respect to any other provision of subsection (a), may in 18addition to the penalties provided therein, be fined an amount 19not to exceed $500,000.20    (b-1) Excluding violations of this Act when the controlled 21substance is fentanyl, any person sentenced to a term of 22imprisonment with respect to violations of Section 401, 401.1, 23405, 405.1, 405.2, or 407, when the substance containing the 24controlled substance contains any amount of fentanyl, 6 3 25years shall be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the 26court, and the maximum sentence for the offense shall be   HB1038- 10 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1increased by 6 3 years.2    (c) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 3the following amounts of controlled or counterfeit substances 4or controlled substance analogs, notwithstanding any of the 5provisions of subsections (a), (b), (d), (e), (f), (g) or (h) 6to the contrary, is guilty of a Class 1 felony. The fine for 7violation of this subsection (c) shall not be more than 8$250,000; except any person who violates this Section with 9regards to paragraph (1.5) of subsection (a) is guilty of a 10Class X felony:11        (1) 1 gram or more but less than 15 grams of any 12    substance containing heroin, or an analog thereof;13        (1.5) 1 gram or more but less than 15 grams of any 14    substance containing fentanyl, or an analog thereof;15        (2) 1 gram or more but less than 15 grams of any 16    substance containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;17        (3) 10 grams or more but less than 15 grams of any 18    substance containing morphine, or an analog thereof;19        (4) 50 grams or more but less than 200 grams of any 20    substance containing peyote, or an analog thereof;21        (5) 50 grams or more but less than 200 grams of any 22    substance containing a derivative of barbituric acid or 23    any of the salts of a derivative of barbituric acid, or an 24    analog thereof;25        (6) 50 grams or more but less than 200 grams of any 26    substance containing amphetamine or any salt of an optical   HB1038- 11 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1    isomer of amphetamine, or an analog thereof;2        (6.5) (blank);3        (7)(i) 5 grams or more but less than 15 grams of any 4    substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), or 5    an analog thereof, or (ii) more than 10 objects or more 6    than 10 segregated parts of an object or objects but less 7    than 15 objects or less than 15 segregated parts of an 8    object containing in them or having upon them any amount 9    of any substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 10    (LSD), or an analog thereof;11        (7.5)(i) 5 grams or more but less than 15 grams of any 12    substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), 13    (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of 14    subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or derivative 15    thereof, or (ii) more than 10 pills, tablets, caplets, 16    capsules, or objects but less than 15 pills, tablets, 17    caplets, capsules, or objects containing in them or having 18    upon them any amount of any substance listed in paragraph 19    (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), 20    (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an 21    analog or derivative thereof;22        (8) 10 grams or more but less than 30 grams of any 23    substance containing pentazocine or any of the salts, 24    isomers and salts of isomers of pentazocine, or an analog 25    thereof;26        (9) 10 grams or more but less than 30 grams of any   HB1038- 12 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1    substance containing methaqualone or any of the salts, 2    isomers and salts of isomers of methaqualone, or an analog 3    thereof;4        (10) 10 grams or more but less than 30 grams of any 5    substance containing phencyclidine or any of the salts, 6    isomers and salts of isomers of phencyclidine (PCP), or an 7    analog thereof;8        (10.5) 10 grams or more but less than 30 grams of any 9    substance containing ketamine or any of the salts, isomers 10    and salts of isomers of ketamine, or an analog thereof;11        (10.6) 50 grams or more but less than 100 grams of any 12    substance containing hydrocodone, or any of the salts, 13    isomers and salts of isomers of hydrocodone, or an analog 14    thereof;15        (10.7) (blank);16        (10.8) 50 grams or more but less than 100 grams of any 17    substance containing dihydrocodeine, or any of the salts, 18    isomers and salts of isomers of dihydrocodeine, or an 19    analog thereof;20        (10.9) 50 grams or more but less than 100 grams of any 21    substance containing oxycodone, or any of the salts, 22    isomers and salts of isomers of oxycodone, or an analog 23    thereof;24        (11) 50 grams or more but less than 200 grams of any 25    substance containing a substance classified in Schedules I 26    or II, or an analog thereof, which is not otherwise   HB1038- 13 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1    included in this subsection.2    (c-5) (Blank).3    (d) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 4any other amount of a controlled or counterfeit substance 5containing dihydrocodeine or classified in Schedules I or II, 6or an analog thereof, which is (i) a narcotic drug, (ii) 7lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD) or an analog thereof, (iii) 8any substance containing amphetamine or fentanyl or any salt 9or optical isomer of amphetamine or fentanyl, or an analog 10thereof, or (iv) any substance containing N-Benzylpiperazine 11(BZP) or any salt or optical isomer of N-Benzylpiperazine 12(BZP), or an analog thereof, is guilty of a Class 2 felony. The 13fine for violation of this subsection (d) shall not be more 14than $200,000.15    (d-5) (Blank).16    (e) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 17any other amount of a controlled substance other than 18methamphetamine or counterfeit substance classified in 19Schedule I or II, or an analog thereof, which substance is not 20included under subsection (d) of this Section, is guilty of a 21Class 3 felony. The fine for violation of this subsection (e) 22shall not be more than $150,000.23    (f) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 24any other amount of a controlled or counterfeit substance 25classified in Schedule III is guilty of a Class 3 felony. The 26fine for violation of this subsection (f) shall not be more   HB1038- 14 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1than $125,000.2    (g) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 3any other amount of a controlled or counterfeit substance 4classified in Schedule IV is guilty of a Class 3 felony. The 5fine for violation of this subsection (g) shall not be more 6than $100,000.7    (h) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 8any other amount of a controlled or counterfeit substance 9classified in Schedule V is guilty of a Class 3 felony. The 10fine for violation of this subsection (h) shall not be more 11than $75,000.12    (i) This Section does not apply to the manufacture, 13possession or distribution of a substance in conformance with 14the provisions of an approved new drug application or an 15exemption for investigational use within the meaning of 16Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act.17    (j) (Blank).18(Source: P.A. 99-371, eff. 1-1-16; 99-585, eff. 1-1-17; 19100-368, eff. 1-1-18.) 20    (720 ILCS 570/401.1)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1401.1)21    Sec. 401.1. Controlled Substance Trafficking. 22    (a) Except for purposes as authorized by this Act, any 23person who knowingly brings or causes to be brought into this 24State for the purpose of manufacture or delivery or with the 25intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance other   HB1038- 15 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1than methamphetamine or counterfeit substance in this or any 2other state or country is guilty of controlled substance 3trafficking.4    (b) A person convicted of controlled substance trafficking 5shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment not less than 6twice the minimum term and fined an amount as authorized by 7Section 401 of this Act, based upon the amount of controlled or 8counterfeit substance brought or caused to be brought into 9this State, and not more than twice the maximum term of 10imprisonment and fined twice the amount as authorized by 11Section 401 of this Act, based upon the amount of controlled or 12counterfeit substance brought or caused to be brought into 13this State; except if the substance trafficked contains any 14amount of fentanyl, a person convicted of controlled substance 15trafficking shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment not 16less than 3 times the minimum term and fined an amount as 17authorized by Section 401 of this Act, based upon the amount of 18fentanyl brought or caused to be brought into this State, and 19not more than 3 times the maximum term of imprisonment and 20fined 3 times the amount as authorized by Section 401 of this 21Act, based upon the amount of fentanyl brought or caused to be 22brought into this State.23    (c) It shall be a Class 2 felony for which a fine not to 24exceed $100,000 may be imposed for any person to knowingly use 25a cellular radio telecommunication device in the furtherance 26of controlled substance trafficking. This penalty shall be in   HB1038- 16 -LRB104 03253 RLC 13275 b1addition to any other penalties imposed by law.2(Source: P.A. 94-556, eff. 9-11-05.)